Maryland, session 2025, HB0962.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
7.5–802.
(a) (1) There is a Maryland Mental Health and Substance Use Disorder
Registry and Referral System in the Department.
(2) The purpose of the Registry and Referral System is to provide a
statewide system through which health care providers can identify and access available
PRIVATE AND STATE inpatient and outpatient mental health and substance use services
for patients in a seamless manner.

HOUSE BILL 962 3
(3) Subject to the availability of funds, the Department shall develop and
implement the Registry and Referral System, in collaboration with the State–designated
Health Information Exchange.
(4) The Registry and Referral System shall include:
(i) A searchable inventory of any PRIVATE OR STATE provider of
mental health and substance use disorder services, including inpatient, crisis, and
outpatient services;
(ii) The capability to allow a provider of mental health and substance
use disorder services to update registry information including the real–time availability of
services; and
(iii) An electronic referral system that is available to any health care
provider in the State to facilitate electronic referrals to mental health and substance use
disorder providers.
(d) Each PRIVATE AND STATE hospital shall ensure the availability of staff to
identify appropriate and available services for patients in the hospital who are in need of
mental health or substance use disorder services and to assist the patient in accessing the
services.
19–386. RESERVED.
19–387. RESERVED.
PART XII. PEDIATRIC OVERSTAY.
19–388.
(A) IN THIS PART, “PEDIATRIC HOSPITAL THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE
THE MEANINGS INDICATED.
(B) “COORDINATORS” MEANS THE PEDIATRIC OVERSTAY COORDINATOR IN
THE DEPARTMENT AND THE PEDIATRIC OVERSTAY COORDINATOR IN THE
DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES.
(C) “PEDIATRIC HOSPITAL OVERSTAY PATIENT” MEANS A PATIENT UNDER
THE AGE OF 22 YEARS WHO REMAINS IN AN INPATIENT UNIT OR EMERGENCY
DEPARTMENT OF A HOSPITAL FOR MORE THAN 24 48 HOURS AFTER BEING
MEDICALLY CLEARED FOR DISCHARGE OR TRANSFER.
19–389.

HOUSE BILL 962
(A) (1) THE DEPARTMENT, IN COORDINATION WITH THE DEPARTMENT
OF HUMAN SERVICES, EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ENSURE THAT A PEDIATRIC HOSPITAL
OVERSTAY PATIENT IS TRANSFERRED TO AND TREATED IN THE LEAST RESTRICTIVE
SETTING WHEN CLINICALLY INDICATED AND WHEN POSSIBLE.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES, IN COORDINATION WITH
THE DEPARTMENT, SHALL ENSURE THAT A PEDIATRIC HOSPITAL OVERSTAY
PATIENT WHO IS A CHILD COMMITTED TO THE CARE AND CUSTODY OF THE
DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES IS TRANSFERRED TO AND TREATED IN THE
LEAST RESTRICTIVE SETTING WHEN CLINICALLY INDICATED AND WHEN POSSIBLE.
(B) IF A PEDIATRIC HOSPITAL OVERSTAY PATIENT REMAINS IN THE
HOSPITAL FOR MORE THAN 48 HOURS AND THE REGISTRY ESTABLISHED UNDER §
7.5–802 OF THIS ARTICLE INDICATES THAT AN APPROPRIATE INPATIENT BED IS
AVAILABLE, THE HOSPITAL SHALL SEEK THE TRANSFER TO MAINTAIN THE CLINICAL
STABILITY OF THE PATIENT.
(C) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF LAW, TO ENSURE THAT
A PEDIATRIC HOSPITAL OVERSTAY PATIENT IS TREATED IN THE LEAST RESTRICTIVE
SETTING, A HOSPITAL MAY CONCURRENTLY EXPLORE IN–STATE AND
OUT–OF–STATE PLACEMENT OPTIONS.
19–390.
(A) THE DEPARTMENT AND THE DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES
SHALL ESTABLISH A PEDIATRIC HOSPITAL OVERSTAY COORDINATOR WITHIN EACH
DEPARTMENT.
(B) THE COORDINATORS SHALL ACT IN THE BEST INTEREST OF A PEDIATRIC
OVERSTAY PATIENT BY COORDINATING BETWEEN HOSPITALS, RELEVANT STATE
AGENCIES AND PROGRAMS, AND PROVIDERS OF MENTAL HEALTH AND SUBSTANCE
USE DISORDER SERVICES.
(C) THE COORDINATORS SHALL:
(1) ADVOCATE ON BEHALF OF PEDIATRIC HOSPITAL OVERSTAY
PATIENTS WHILE MAINTAINING APPROPRIATE PATIENT CONFIDENTIALITY;
(2) REVIEW POLICIES AND PROCEDURES OF RELEVANT STATE
AGENCIES AND MAKE RECOMMENDATIONS FOR NECESSARY CHANGES TO THE
POLICIES AND PROCEDURES TO BETTER SERVE PEDIATRIC HOSPITAL OVERSTAY
PATIENTS;

HOUSE BILL 962 5
(3) MAINTAIN DATA ON EACH PEDIATRIC HOSPITAL OVERSTAY
PATIENT, INCLUDING:
(I) PATIENT’S LENGTH OF STAY;
(II) THE RESPONSIBLE STATE AGENCY, IF APPLICABLE;
(III) SERVICES NEEDED;
(IV) PLACEMENT OPTIONS BEING SOUGHT BY THE PATIENT;
(V) INFORMATION REGARDING PREVIOUS HOSPITAL
ADMISSIONS FOR A BEHAVIORAL HEALTH DIAGNOSIS; AND
(VI) ANY OTHER RELEVANT DATA; AND
(4) REPORT ON THE DATA COLLECTED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION TO
THE SECRETARY AND THE SECRETARY OF HUMAN SERVICES.
(A) (1) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2026, THE GOVERNOR MAY INCLUDE IN THE
ANNUAL BUDGET BILL AN APPROPRIATION SUFFICIENT TO FILL ALL POSITIONS
AUTHORIZED FOR A REGIONAL INSTITUTE FOR CHILDREN AND ADOLESCENTS IN
THE STATE.
(2) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2027 AND EACH FISCAL YEAR THEREAFTER,
THE GOVERNOR SHALL INCLUDE IN THE ANNUAL BUDGET BILL AN APPROPRIATION
SUFFICIENT TO FILL ALL POSITIONS AUTHORIZED FOR A REGIONAL INSTITUTE FOR
CHILDREN AND ADOLESCENTS IN THE STATE.
(B) THE GOVERNOR MAY USE FUNDS DESIGNATED FOR THE ADOLESCENT
HOSPITAL OVERSTAY PROGRAM FOR THE PURPOSES IDENTIFIED IN SUBSECTION
(A) OF THIS SECTION.
Article – State Government
9–2801.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(B) “COORDINATOR” MEANS THE PEDIATRIC HOSPITAL OVERSTAY
COORDINATOR WITHIN THE GOVERNOR’S OFFICE FOR CHILDREN.
[(b)] (C) “Eligible neighborhood” means a neighborhood that includes census
tracts with more than 30% of children living in poverty and is served by, as defined by the

HOUSE BILL 962
Office, a community school with a concentration of poverty level, as defined in § 5–223 of
the Education Article, of:
(1) in fiscal year 2025 and 2026, at least 80%;
(2) in fiscal year 2027 through fiscal year 2029, at least 75%;
(3) in fiscal year 2030, at least 60%; and
(4) in fiscal year 2031, and each fiscal year thereafter, at least 55%.
[(c)] (D) “Fund” means the ENOUGH Grant Fund.
[(d)] (E) “Office” means the Governor’s Office for Children.
(F) “PEDIATRIC HOSPITAL OVERSTAY PATIENT” HAS THE MEANING STATED
IN § 19–388 OF THE HEALTH – GENERAL ARTICLE.
[(e)] (G) “Program” means the Engaging Neighborhoods, Organizations, Unions,
Governments, and Households (ENOUGH) Grant Program.
[(f)] (H) “Special Secretary” means the Special Secretary of the Governor’s
Office for Children.
9–2806.
(A) THERE IS A PEDIATRIC HOSPITAL OVERSTAY COORDINATOR WITHIN
THE OFFICE.
(B) THE COORDINATOR SHALL ACT IN THE BEST INTEREST OF A PEDIATRIC
HOSPITAL OVERSTAY PATIENT BY COORDINATING BETWEEN RELEVANT STATE
AGENCIES AND PROGRAMS, INCLUDING PUBLIC BEHAVIORAL HEALTH CARE
COORDINATION PROGRAMS.
(C) (1) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2026, THE OFFICE AND THE
COORDINATOR SHALL ENTER INTO A MEMORANDUM OF UNDERSTANDING WITH THE
MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH, THE DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES,
AND ANY OTHER RELEVANT STATE AGENCY FOR THE SHARING AND STORAGE OF
INFORMATION AND DATA RELATED TO PEDIATRIC HOSPITAL OVERSTAY PATIENTS
IN THE STATE.
(2) THE MEMORANDUM OF UNDERSTANDING SHALL GOVERN THE
ACCESS, USE, MAINTENANCE, DISCLOSURE, AND REDISCLOSURE OF PROTECTED
HEALTH INFORMATION IN ACCORDANCE WITH FEDERAL AND STATE LAW,

HOUSE BILL 962 7
INCLUDING THE FEDERAL HEALTH INSURANCE PORTABILITY AND
ACCOUNTABILITY ACT.
(D) THE COORDINATOR SHALL:
(1) WORK INDEPENDENTLY AND IMPARTIALLY, WHILE MAINTAINING
APPROPRIATE PATIENT CONFIDENTIALITY, TO ADVOCATE ON BEHALF OF
PEDIATRIC HOSPITAL OVERSTAY PATIENTS;
(2) REVIEW POLICIES AND PROCEDURES OF RELEVANT STATE
AGENCIES AND MAKE RECOMMENDATIONS FOR NECESSARY CHANGES TO THE
POLICIES OR PROCEDURES TO BETTER SERVE PEDIATRIC HOSPITAL OVERSTAY
PATIENTS; AND
(3) MAINTAIN DATA ON EACH PEDIATRIC HOSPITAL OVERSTAY
PATIENT, INCLUDING:
(I) THE PATIENT’S LENGTH OF STAY;
(II) THE RESPONSIBLE STATE AGENCY, IF APPLICABLE;
(III) SERVICES NEEDED;
(IV) PLACEMENT OPTIONS BEING SOUGHT BY THE PATIENT;
(V) INFORMATION REGARDING PREVIOUS HOSPITAL
ADMISSIONS FOR A BEHAVIORAL HEALTH DIAGNOSIS; AND
(VI) ANY OTHER RELEVANT DATA.
(E) ON OR BEFORE OCTOBER 1 EACH YEAR, BEGINNING IN 2026, THE
COORDINATOR SHALL REPORT TO THE GOVERNOR AND, IN ACCORDANCE WITH §
2–1257 OF THIS ARTICLE, THE SENATE FINANCE COMMITTEE AND THE HOUSE
HEALTH AND GOVERNMENT OPERATIONS COMMITTEE ON THE NUMBER OF
PEDIATRIC HOSPITAL OVERSTAY PATIENTS IN THE STATE AND DE–IDENTIFIED
INFORMATION RELATED TO ACTION PLANS IN PLACE TO ACHIEVE APPROPRIATE
PLACEMENT.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) The Maryland Department of Health shall:
(1) review the reimbursement rates paid to residential treatment centers
and respite care facilities in the State and determine the reimbursement rate that would

HOUSE BILL 962
be necessary to cover the cost of care and prevent future bed closures in residential
treatment centers and respite care facilities in the State; and
(2) study the implementation of a prospective payment model for
residential treatment centers and respite care facilities in the State with the goal of
incentivizing the expansion of residential treatment center and respite care facility capacity
in the State.
(b) On or before December 1, 2025, the Department shall report the findings and
recommendations from the review and study conducted under subsection (a) of this section
to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the
Senate Finance Committee and the House Health and Government Operations Committee.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) (1) In this section, “child in an unlicensed setting” means an individual
under the age of 21 years in an out–of–home placement who is residing in a hotel, an office
building, a shelter, or any other unlicensed setting.
(2) “Child in an unlicensed setting” does not include an individual under
the age of 21 years who is receiving a self–independent living stipend, living with kin
awaiting approval for a placement, or on aftercare with a parent.
(b) (1) There is a Workgroup on Children in Unlicensed Settings and Pediatric
Hospital Overstays in the State.
(2) The Workgroup shall consist of representatives who have experience
and knowledge of working with children with behavioral health challenges, adverse
childhood experiences, and developmental disabilities, including:
(i) the Secretary of Health, or the Secretary’s designee;
(ii) the Secretary of Human Services, or the Secretary’s designee;
(iii) the Secretary of Juvenile Services, or the Secretary’s designee;
(iv) the State Public Defender, or the State Public Defender’s
designee; and
(v) the following members, appointed by the Governor:
1. one representative of the Maryland Association of
Resources for Families and Youth;
2. one representative of Disability Rights Maryland;

HOUSE BILL 962 9
3. one representative of the Community Behavioral Health
Association of Maryland;
4. one representative of Maryland Legal Aid;
5. one representative of the Court Appointed Special
Advocates of Maryland;
6. one representative of the National Association of Social
Workers – Maryland who is a hospital–based clinical social worker;
7. one representative of the Maryland Chapter of the
American Academy of Pediatrics;
8. one representative of the Maryland Hospital Association;
9. one representative of a specialty psychiatric hospital;
10. one representative of a residential treatment provider in
the State; and
11. one representative of a family of a child in foster care, as
defined in § 8–101(h) of the Human Services Article.
(3) The members of the Workgroup shall elect the chair and vice chair of
the Workgroup.
(4) The Workgroup shall meet before August 1, 2025, and at least once
every 30 days thereafter.
(5) The State Council on Child Abuse and Neglect shall provide staff for
the Workgroup.
(6) A member of the Workgroup:
(i) may not receive compensation as a member of the Workgroup;
but
(ii) is entitled to reimbursement for expenses under the Standard
State Travel Regulations, as provided in the State budget.
(c) (1) The Workgroup shall:
(i) complete an assessment of the number, type, and cost of the
additional beds and supportive services needed to place all children in pediatric overstays
and other unlicensed settings in the least restrictive settings;

HOUSE BILL 962
(ii) develop a comprehensive and sustainable resource development
plan designed to increase the number of licensed settings and end the use of pediatric
overstays and unlicensed settings;
(iii) develop an implementation plan with comprehensive data to
inform the plan; and
(iv) determine the anticipated timeline for when the practice of
placing children in unlicensed settings will cease.
(2) On or before October 1, 2025, the Workgroup shall report its findings
and recommendations to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State
Government Article, the General Assembly.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That for fiscal year 2026, the
Governor may include in the annual budget bill an appropriation necessary to staff five
additional beds at the John L. Gildner Regional Institute for Children and Adolescents in
the State.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 2 Sections 1 and 3 of
this Act shall take effect June July 1, 2025.
SECTION 3. 5. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, except as provided in
Section 4 of this Act, this Act shall take effect July June 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.